Utah statutes.
76-6-1408.   Falsification of seller's statement to dealer.

(1)  Any seller who, in providing any information as required by this part in selling, offering, or attempting to sell regulated metal willfully makes a false statement or provides any untrue information, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) that occurs after the defendant has been convicted of a violation of Subsection (1) is a class A misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

